Tennessee, session 114, HB0744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 21, Part 8, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
An organization or entity receiving financial assistance from this state for
programs or activities shall not deny benefits to, exclude from participation in, or
discriminate against a person otherwise eligible for the program or activity on the basis
of race, color, religion, or national origin.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0744
000230
- 1 -